Utah statutes.
59-12-206.   Collection of taxes by commission -- Administrative charge.

(1)  The commission shall transmit the sales and use tax revenues the commission collects in accordance with a contract with any county, city, or town monthly by electronic funds transfer.

(2)  The commission shall retain and deposit an administrative charge in accordance with Section 59-1-306 from revenues the commission collects from a tax under this part.



Amended by Chapter 309, 2011 General Session

